Kentucky statutes. TITLE I Sovereignty and Jurisdiction of the Commonwealth
Concurrent Legislative Jurisdiction for Criminal Law Enforcement Purposes

3.250.
Legislative finding.

The General Assembly finds that it is desirable that the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the United States exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over lands of the National Park System of the United States Department of the Interior lying within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and to that end KRS

3.255

to

3.275

provides a mechanism for the adjustment of legislative jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

3.255.
Definition.

“Concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement,” as used in KRS

3.250

to

3.275

, means the joint power of the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky to enact and enforce their own criminal laws, including those pertaining to motor vehicle traffic control, over the lands in question. Under concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement, both the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or either of them, may take jurisdiction over a given criminal offense, according to the laws of the respective sovereign.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

3.260.
Application by United States for concurrent legislative jurisdiction — Procedure.

Whenever the United States shall desire to acquire concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over any lands within this Commonwealth which the United States has or shall have acquired for purposes of the establishment or extension of a unit of the National Park System of the United States Department of the Interior and shall make application for that purpose, Kentucky cedes such measure of legislative jurisdiction, not exceeding that requested by the United States, as may be necessary to enable the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky to exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over such lands. The Governor is directed to negotiate with the United States, on behalf of the General Assembly, the administrative details of any such cession, which details shall be included in the instrument of cession.

Said application on behalf of the United States shall be accompanied by an accurate description of the lands over which such concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement is desired.

Said cession of legislative jurisdiction shall become effective when the instrument of cession is signed by the Governor and the acceptance of jurisdiction by the United States is indicated in writing upon the instrument of cession by the United States Secretary of the Interior or his designee and entered upon the executive journal. In the event the Governor is of the opinion that the cession of legislative jurisdiction embodied in any proposed instrument of cession exceeds the measure of legislative jurisdiction necessary to enable the United States and the Commonwealth of Kentucky to exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over the lands in question, he shall not sign the instrument of cession, and the cession shall not become effective until the General Assembly, at its next session, shall approve same.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

3.265.
Limitation of jurisdiction ceded.

The powers conferred by KRS

3.255

to

3.275

are solely to enable the Commonwealth and the United States to exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over United States Department of the Interior National Park System lands in Kentucky. No other legislative jurisdiction is ceded by KRS

3.255

to

3.275

, and there are specifically reserved over any lands as to which any legislative jurisdiction may be ceded pursuant to KRS 3.255 to 3.275:

The entire legislative jurisdiction with respect to taxation of the Commonwealth, and of each state agency, county, urban-county government, city, special district and other political subdivision;

The entire legislative jurisdiction of the Commonwealth with respect to marriage, divorce, annulment, adoption, the commitment or other civil disposition of the mentally incompetent, and the descent and distribution of property; and

The power to execute any process, civil or criminal, issued under the authority of the Commonwealth.

No person residing upon such lands shall be deprived of any civil or political rights by reason of the cession of such legislative jurisdiction to the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

3.270.
Relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction by United States — Acceptance — Governor’s duties.

Whenever the United States, in order to enable the Commonwealth and the United States to exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement, tenders to the Commonwealth a relinquishment of all or part of the legislative jurisdiction theretofore acquired by it over lands within this Commonwealth for purposes of the establishment or extension of a unit of the National Park System of the United States Department of the Interior, Kentucky accepts the legislative jurisdiction so relinquished.

The acceptance of such relinquishment of jurisdiction shall be indicated by a writing signed by the Governor addressed to the United States Secretary of the Interior, or as the laws of the United States may otherwise provide, and such acceptance shall be effective when said writing is deposited in the United States mails or, if it is not mailed, when it is personally handed to the Secretary of the Interior or his designee.

The Governor shall negotiate with the United States, on behalf of the General Assembly, the administrative details of any relinquishment of jurisdiction by the United States under the provisions of KRS

3.255

to

3.275

. In the event the Governor is of the opinion that the relinquishment of legislative jurisdiction tendered by the United States exceeds that necessary to enable the Commonwealth and the United States to exercise concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over the lands in question, or commits the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions to expenses or obligations beyond those necessarily entailed by the exercise of concurrent legislative jurisdiction for purposes of criminal law enforcement over the lands in question, the Governor shall not indicate the acceptance of such relinquishment of jurisdiction, and such acceptance shall not become effective until the General Assembly, at its next session, shall approve same.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

3.275.
Consultation with appropriate local authorities.

Whenever an acceptance or cession of legislative jurisdiction is sought by the United States pursuant to the terms of KRS

3.255

to

3.275

, the Governor, prior to negotiating the administrative details of any such acceptance or cession, shall consult with the appropriate local authorities within whose territorial jurisdictions the lands in question lie, including, but not limited to the county judges/executive, the mayors and the sheriffs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 68, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.